Utah statutes.
9-4-1408.    Recognition of community action agencies.

The office shall have the power to:

(1)  recognize eligible organizations as community action agencies;

(2)  withdraw the recognition or terminate funding of a designated community action agency for cause, as established by rule; or

(3)  change the boundaries and the number of recognized community action agencies, provided that the governing board of each affected community action agency concurs in the action.

